Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 682.
SECTION 2. (1) An organ  transport vehicle may not operate in this state unless the or-
gan transport vehicle is licensed under this section.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority shall issue an organ transport vehicle license to an or-
gan procurement organization, as defined in ORS 97.953, that:
(a) Applies to the authority as required by the authority by rule;
(b) Demonstrates that  the organ transport vehicle to be licensed is clearly and
identifiably marked on all sides of the vehicle as an organ transport vehicle; and
(c) Provides proof of  commercial general liability insurance in the amount of $5,000,000,
automobile liability insurance in the amount of $5,000,000 and an umbrella policy of $2,000,000.
(3) Only a person who meets the requirements  of this subsection and who is employed
or contracted by an organ procurement organization licensed under this section may drive
an organ transport vehicle. In order to drive an organ transport vehicle, a person must:
(a) Be at least 25 years of age;
(b) Be a current, former or retired police  officer, firefighter or emergency medical ser-
vices provider;
(c) Have a minimum of five years of experience operating  an official police vehicle, fire
department vehicle or ambulance under emergency conditions;
(d) Hold a valid driver license;
(e) Not have more than one traffic offense that  was committed while driving a motor
vehicle, not including parking violations, in any three-year period;
(f) Pass an emergency vehicle operators course and a  defensive drivers course approved
by the authority; and
(g) Meet any other requirements established by the authority by  rule, including rules
related to state or nationwide criminal records checks conducted under ORS 181A.195.
(4) In order to obtain a license under this section, an  organ procurement organization
may require a person applying for  employment or a contract to drive an organ transport
vehicle on behalf of the  organ procurement organization to provide to the authority the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 1
person’s fingerprints for the purposes of conducting a  state or nationwide criminal records
check under ORS 181A.195.
(5) The authority shall establish by rule:
(a) A license fee and a license renewal fee; and
(b) Requirements for the renewal of a license issued under this section.
(6) As used in this section, “traffic offense”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
801.555.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 682.025 is amended to read:
682.025. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Ambulance” or “ambulance vehicle” means  a privately or publicly owned motor vehicle,
aircraft or watercraft that is regularly provided or  offered to be provided for the emergency trans-
portation of persons who are ill or injured or who have disabilities.
(2) “Ambulance service” means a person, governmental unit or other entity that operates  am-
bulances and that holds itself out as providing prehospital care or  medical transportation to persons
who are ill or injured or who have disabilities.
(3) “Emergency care” means the  performance of acts or procedures under emergency conditions
in the observation, care and counsel of persons who  are ill or injured or who have disabilities; in
the administration of care or medications prescribed by a licensed physician  or naturopathic physi-
cian, insofar as any of these acts is based upon  knowledge and application of the principles of bi-
ological, physical and social science as required by a  completed course utilizing an approved
curriculum in prehospital emergency care. “Emergency  care” does not include acts of medical di-
agnosis or prescription of therapeutic or corrective measures.
(4) “Emergency medical services provider” means a person who has received formal training  in
prehospital and emergency  care, and is licensed to attend any person who is ill or injured or who
has a disability. Police officers, firefighters, funeral home employees and other  persons serving in
a dual capacity one of which meets the definition of “emergency medical services  provider” are
“emergency medical services providers” within the meaning of this chapter.
(5) “Fraud or deception” means the intentional misrepresentation or misstatement of  a material
fact, concealment of or failure to make known any material fact, or any  other means by which
misinformation or false impression knowingly is given.
(6) “Governmental unit” means the state or  any county, municipality or other political subdivi-
sion or any department, board or other agency of any of them.
(7) “Highway” means every public way, thoroughfare and place, including bridges, viaducts  and
other structures within the boundaries of this state, used or intended  for the use of the general
public for vehicles.
(8) “Nonemergency care”  means the performance of acts or procedures on a patient who is not
expected to die, become permanently disabled  or suffer permanent harm within the next 24 hours,
including but not limited to observation, care and counsel of a patient and the administration  of
medications prescribed by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician
licensed under ORS chapter 685, insofar as any of those acts are based upon  knowledge and appli-
cation of the principles of biological, physical and social science and  are performed in accordance
with scope of practice rules adopted by the  Oregon Medical Board or Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine in the course of providing prehospital care.
(9)(a) “Organ transport vehicle” means  any motor vehicle operated or contracted by an
organ procurement organization for the emergency transportation of body parts intended to
be transplanted.
(b) As used in this subsection,  “body part” and “organ procurement organization” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 97.953.
[(9)] (10) “Owner” means the person having  all the incidents of ownership in an ambulance
service or an ambulance vehicle or  where the incidents of ownership are in different persons, the
person, other than a security interest holder or lessor,  entitled to the possession of an ambulance
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 2
vehicle or operation of an ambulance service under a  security agreement or a lease for a term of
10 or more successive days.
[(10)] (11) “Patient” means a person who is ill or injured or who has  a disability and who re-
ceives emergency or nonemergency care from an emergency medical services provider.
[(11)] (12) “Prehospital  care” means care rendered by emergency medical services providers as
an incident of  the operation of an ambulance and care rendered by emergency medical services
providers as incidents of other public or private safety duties, and includes, but is not limited to,
“emergency care.”
[(12)] (13) “Scope of practice” means the maximum level of  emergency or nonemergency care
that an emergency medical services provider may provide.
[(13)] (14) “Standing orders” means the  written protocols that an emergency medical services
provider follows to treat patients when direct contact with a physician is not maintained.
[(14)] (15) “Supervising physician” means a physician licensed under  ORS 677.100 to 677.228,
actively registered and in good standing with the Oregon Medical Board, who provides direction of
emergency or nonemergency care provided by emergency medical services providers.
[(15)] (16) “Unprofessional conduct” means conduct unbecoming a  person licensed to perform
emergency care, or detrimental to the best interests of the public and includes:
(a) Any conduct or practice contrary to recognized standards of ethics of the medical  profession
or any conduct or practice which does or might constitute a danger to  the health or safety of a
patient or  the public or any conduct, practice or condition which does or might impair an emergency
medical services provider’s ability safely and skillfully to  practice emergency or nonemergency care;
(b) Willful performance of any medical treatment which is contrary  to acceptable medical
standards; and
(c) Willful and consistent utilization of medical service for treatment which is or  may be con-
sidered inappropriate or unnecessary.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 682.031 is amended to read:
682.031. (1) As used  in this section, “political subdivision” includes counties, cities, districts,
authorities and other public corporations and entities organized and existing under statute or
charter.
(2) An ordinance of any political subdivision  regulating ambulance services , [ or] emergency
medical services providers or organ transport vehicles  may not require less than is required under
ORS 820.300 to 820.380, or this chapter or the rules adopted by the  Oregon Health Authority under
this chapter.
(3) When a political subdivision enacts  an ordinance regulating ambulance services , [ or] emer-
gency medical services providers  or organ transport vehicles , the ordinance must comply  with the
county plan for ambulance services and ambulance service areas  adopted under ORS 682.062 by the
county  in  which the political subdivision is situated and with the rules of the Oregon Health Au-
thority relating to such services and  service areas. The county governing body shall make the de-
termination of whether the ordinance is in compliance with the county plan.
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 6. (1) “Organ transport  vehicle” means any motor vehicle operated or con-
tracted by an organ procurement organization  for the emergency transportation of body
parts intended to be transplanted.
(2) As used  in this section, “body part” and “organ procurement organization” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 97.953.
SECTION 7.  ORS 811.145 is amended to read:
811.145. (1) A  person commits the offense of failure to yield to an emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or  ambulance if an ambulance , organ transport vehicle  or emergency vehicle
that is using a visual or audible signal in a manner described under ORS 820.300 and 820.320 ap-
proaches the vehicle the person is operating and the person does not do all of the following:
(a) Yield the right of way to the ambulance , organ transport vehicle  or emergency vehicle.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 3
(b) Immediately drive to a position as near as possible and parallel to  the right-hand edge or
curb of the roadway clear of any intersection.
(c) Stop and remain in such position until the emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or
ambulance has passed.
(2) A person is not in violation of this section if the person is acting as otherwise directed by
a police officer.
(3) This section does not relieve the driver of an emergency vehicle , organ  transport vehicle
or ambulance from the duty to drive with due  regard for the safety of all persons using the highway,
nor does this section protect the  driver of any such vehicle from the consequence of an arbitrary
exercise of the right of way granted under this section.
(4) The  offense described in this section, failure to yield to an emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 8.  ORS 811.150 is amended to read:
811.150. (1) A person commits the offense of interference with  an emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance if the person does any of the following:
(a) Drives a vehicle following at a distance closer than  500 feet any emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance that is traveling in response to a fire alarm or emergency.
(b) Drives or parks a  vehicle in a manner that interferes with the emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance responding to a fire alarm or emergency.
(c) Drives over an  unprotected hose of a fire department laid down on any highway, private road
or driveway to be used at any fire, alarm of fire or emergency.
(2) The following exemptions apply to this section:
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits a driver of an emergency vehicle , organ transport  vehicle
or ambulance from following within 500 feet of an emergency  vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or
ambulance traveling in response to a fire alarm or emergency or from driving into  or parking a
vehicle in the area or vicinity where such vehicles have stopped in response to an alarm or  emer-
gency.
(b) Nothing in this section prevents any person from driving over an unprotected hose of a fire
department if the person first obtains the  permission of a fire department official or police officer
at the scene of the fire, alarm of fire or emergency.
(3) The offense described in this section, interference with an emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 811.265 is amended to read:
811.265. (1) A person commits the offense of  driver failure to obey a traffic control device if the
person drives a vehicle and the person does any of the following:
(a) Fails to obey the directions of any traffic control device.
(b) Fails to obey any specific traffic control device  described in ORS 811.260 in the manner re-
quired by that section.
(2) A person is not subject to this section if the person is doing any of the following:
(a) Following the directions of a police officer.
(b) Driving an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance in accordance  with
the privileges granted those vehicles under ORS 820.300.
(c) Properly proceeding on a red light as authorized under ORS 811.360.
(d) Driving in a funeral procession led by  a funeral lead vehicle or under the direction of the
driver of a funeral escort vehicle.
(e) Properly entering an intersection or executing a  turn at a stop sign as authorized under ORS
814.414.
(f) Properly entering an intersection or executing a turn at a flashing red signal  as authorized
under ORS 814.416.
(3) The offense described  in this section, driver failure to obey a traffic control device, is a Class
B traffic violation.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 811.507 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 4
811.507. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Driving” means operating a motor vehicle on a highway or premises open to the  public,
and while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device or other momentary de-
lays.
(B) “Driving” does not  include when the motor vehicle has stopped in a location where it can
safely remain stationary and:
(i) Is pulled over on the side of, or is pulled off, a roadway;
(ii) Is in a designated parking space; or
(iii) Is required to park in the roadway to conduct construction or utility maintenance work.
(b) “Hands-free accessory”  means an attachment or built-in feature for or an addition to a mo-
bile electronic device that gives a person the ability to keep both  hands on the steering wheel at
all times while using the device or requires only the minimal use of a finger, via a swipe or  tap, to
activate or deactivate a function of the device.
(c) “Livestock” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.125.
(d)(A) “Mobile electronic device” means an electronic device  that is not permanently installed
in a motor vehicle.
(B) “Mobile electronic device”  includes but is not limited to a device capable of text messaging,
voice  communication,  entertainment, navigation, accessing the Internet or producing electronic mail.
(e) “Using a mobile electronic device” includes but is  not limited to using a mobile electronic
device for text messaging, voice communication,  entertainment, navigation, accessing the Internet
or producing electronic mail.
(2) A  person commits the offense of driving a motor vehicle while using a mobile electronic de-
vice if the person, while driving a motor vehicle on a highway or premises open to the public:
(a) Holds a mobile electronic device in the person’s hand; or
(b) Uses a mobile electronic device for any purpose.
(3) This section does not apply to a person:
(a) Who is employed as  a commercial motor vehicle driver, or as a school bus driver, and is
using a mobile  electronic device within the scope of the person’s employment if the use is permitted
under regulations promulgated pursuant to 49 U.S.C. 31136;
(b) Who is employed as a driver of a vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating  or gross ve-
hicle weight of at least  10,001 pounds and is using a mobile electronic device within the scope of
the person’s employment  and as required under regulations promulgated pursuant to 49 U.S.C. 31137;
(c) Who is operating a two-way radio device  that transmits radio communication transmitted by
a station operating on an authorized frequency within the  business, citizens’ or family radio service
bands in accordance with rules of the Federal Communications Commission while transporting forest
products, or while operating a vehicle to assist in logging operations, within the scope of  the
person’s employment;
(d) Who is using a two-way radio device while operating a  school bus or school activity vehicle
within the scope of the person’s employment;
(e) Who is using a two-way radio device or operating a two-way radio device that transmits ra-
dio communication transmitted by a station  operating on an authorized frequency within the busi-
ness, citizens’ or family radio service bands  in accordance with rules of the Federal Communications
Commission while operating  a vehicle owned or contracted by a utility for the purpose of installing,
repairing, maintaining,  operating or upgrading utility service, including but not limited to natural
gas, electricity, water or telecommunications, within the scope of the person’s employment;
(f) Who is using a two-way radio  device while operating a vehicle wider than the lane of travel,
a vehicle transporting livestock or a vehicle requiring a slow-moving vehicle  emblem under ORS
815.110, and the use of the device facilitates the safe operation of the vehicle; or
(g) Who is using a two-way radio device while operating a pilot or safety vehicle used  to assist
the safe movement of a vehicle  described in paragraph (f) of this subsection, and the use of the de-
vice facilitates the safe movement of the vehicle described in paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(4) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution of a person under this section that the person:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 5
(a) Used the mobile electronic device to communicate if the person was summoning  or providing
medical or other emergency help if no other person in the vehicle was capable of summoning help;
(b) Was 18 years of age or older and was using a hands-free accessory;
(c) Was driving an ambulance , organ transport vehicle  or emergency vehicle  while acting
within the scope of the person’s employment;
(d) Was a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical services provider  and was acting
within the scope of the person’s employment;
(e) Was 18 years of age or older, held  a valid amateur radio operator license issued or any other
license issued by the Federal Communications Commission and was operating an amateur radio;
(f) Was operating a two-way radio device that transmits radio communication transmitted  by a
station operating on  an authorized frequency within the business, citizens’ or family radio service
bands in accordance with rules  of the Federal Communications Commission to summon medical or
other emergency help; or
(g) Was using a medical device.
(5) The offense described in this section, driving a motor vehicle while using  a mobile electronic
device, is:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, for a person’s first conviction, a Class
B traffic violation.
(b) For a person’s first conviction, if commission of the offense contributes to an accident  de-
scribed in ORS 811.720, a Class A traffic violation.
(c) For a  person’s second conviction within a 10-year period following the date of the person’s
first conviction, a Class A traffic violation.
(d) For a person’s third or subsequent conviction  within a 10-year period preceding the date of
the person’s current conviction, a Class B misdemeanor.
(6) In addition to any other sentence that may be imposed, the court shall  impose a minimum
fine of $2,000 on a  person convicted of a Class B misdemeanor under subsection (5)(d) of this section.
(7) For purposes of this section, sentences for two or  more convictions that are imposed in the
same sentencing proceeding are considered to be one sentence.
(8)(a) For a person’s first conviction of driving  a motor vehicle while using a mobile electronic
device, the court may suspend the fine  to be imposed under subsection (5)(a) of this section on the
condition that the person, within 120 days of sentencing:
(A) Complete at the  person’s own expense a distracted driving avoidance course approved by the
Department of Transportation under ORS 811.508; and
(B) Provide proof of completion to the court.
(b) The court may schedule a  hearing to determine whether the person successfully completed
the distracted driving avoidance course.
(c) If the person has successfully completed the requirements described in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection, the court shall enter a  sentence of discharge. Notwithstanding ORS 153.021, a sentence
of discharge imposed under this paragraph may not include a fine.
(d) If the person has not successfully  completed the requirements described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the court shall:
(A) Grant the person an extension based on good cause shown; or
(B) Impose the fine under subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(9) The department shall place signs on state  highways to notify drivers that it is unlawful to
drive a motor vehicle on the highways of this state while using a mobile electronic  device and vi-
olators are subject to criminal penalties.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 814.050 is amended to read:
814.050. (1) A pedestrian commits the offense  of pedestrian failure to yield to an ambulance ,
organ transport vehicle  or emergency vehicle if the pedestrian does not yield the  right of way to:
(a) An ambulance used in an emergency situation; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 6
(b) An emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or an ambulance upon the approach of  the
vehicle  using  a visual signal or audible signal or both according to requirements under ORS 820.300
or 820.320.
(2) This  section does not relieve the driver of an ambulance , organ transport vehicle  or
emergency vehicle from the duty to:
(a) Drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway; and
(b) Exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian.
(3) The offense described in  this section, pedestrian failure to yield to an ambulance , organ
transport vehicle or emergency vehicle, is a Class D traffic violation.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 815.225 is amended to read:
815.225. (1) A person commits the offense of violation of use limits on sound equipment if the
person does any of the following:
(a) Uses upon a vehicle, any bell, siren, compression or exhaust whistle.
(b) Uses a horn otherwise than as a reasonable warning or makes any  unnecessary or unrea-
sonably loud or harsh sound by means of a horn or other warning device.
(2) Authorized emergency vehicles , organ transport vehicle  and ambulances are not  subject
to this section but are subject to ORS 820.370 and 820.380.
(3) The offense described in this  section, violation of use limits on sound equipment, is a Class
C traffic violation.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 816.050 is amended to read:
816.050. Each of the following is a requirement for headlights as described:
(1) On vehicles required to be equipped with two or more headlights under ORS 816.320 and
816.330 the headlights shall be equally distributed  on each side of the front of the vehicle. This
subsection does not apply to motorcycles and mopeds.
(2) Headlights shall show a continuously burning light except that:
(a) When permitted under  ORS 814.320, headlights for motorcycles or mopeds may have an upper
beam that can be modulated between a high and lower  brightness at a rate of 200 to 280 pulses per
minute.
(b) A federally approved headlight flashing system may be  used as emergency vehicle lights on
police  vehicles , fire  vehicles , organ transport vehicles,  emergency  vehicles  or ambulance vehi-
cles.
(3) Headlights shall show a white light described in Standard Number  108 of the Federal Motor
Vehicle Safety Standards.
(4) Headlights shall show the light forward.
(5) The Department of Transportation shall adopt and enforce  rules establishing minimum
standards and specifications for headlights. The rules shall conform, insofar as practicable, to  safety
standards and specifications for vehicle lighting issued by the federal government or to standards
and recommendations established by the Society of Automotive Engineers.
(6) When multiple beam headlights are used or when headlights are used in combination with
auxiliary lights or passing lights, the lights shall  be arranged on the vehicle so that the selection
between distributions of light projected to different elevations may be  selected by the driver at will
or so that the selection can be made automatically.
(7) Headlights shall be aimed in accordance with rules  adopted by the department. If headlights
provide only a single distribution of light and are  not supplemented by auxiliary lights, the single
beam headlights shall be so aimed that when  the vehicle is not loaded, none of the high intensity
portion of the light shall, at a distance of  25 feet ahead of the vehicle, project higher than five
inches below the level of the  center of the lamp from which it comes, or higher than 42 inches above
the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of 75 feet ahead of the vehicle.
(8) The intensity of the light of single beam headlights shall be sufficient to reveal persons and
vehicles upon a street or highway at a distance of at least 200 feet ahead of  the vehicle to which
they are attached.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 7
(9) Headlights that are required  under ORS 816.320 and 816.330 must be mounted, adjusted and
aimed in accordance with standards adopted by the department under ORS 816.010.
(10) Headlights that are required under  ORS 816.320 and 816.330 and any part for such headlight
that tends to change the original design  or performance must be of a type that complies with
standards adopted by the department under ORS 816.010.
(11) Single beam headlights that are not supplemented by auxiliary lights shall be  permitted on
a motor vehicle in lieu of multiple beam headlights only if the single distribution of lights complies
with any requirements for single beam headlights under this section.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 816.310 is amended to read:
816.310. This section  establishes exemptions from ORS 816.040 to 816.300. The exemptions under
this section are in addition to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. The exemptions  established under
this section are partial or complete as described in the following:
(1) ORS 816.040 to 816.300 shall not be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts  and
accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of those sections.
(2) Lighting equipment used on  vehicles of special interest that are registered under ORS
805.020 shall be deemed in  compliance with ORS 816.040 to 816.300 if the equipment is original
manufacturer’s equipment and accessories, or their equivalent  and if the equipment is maintained
in safe operating condition.
(3) ORS 816.040 to 816.300 do not apply to equipment on any of the following:
(a) Road machinery.
(b) Road rollers.
(c) Farm tractors.
(d) Antique vehicles that are maintained as a collector’s item and  used for exhibitions, parades,
club activities and similar uses, but not used primarily  for the transportation of persons or property.
(e) Motorized wheelchairs when used as permitted under ORS 811.440.
(4) On any combination of vehicles, only the lighting equipment  on the rearmost vehicle in the
combination of vehicles need be visible from distances specified under ORS 816.040  to 816.290 for
lighting equipment on the rear of vehicles.
(5) Lighting  equipment on bicycles shall meet the requirements established for such equipment
under ORS 815.280.
(6) Vehicle lighting equipment requirements  for ambulances , organ transport vehicles  and
emergency vehicles are established in ORS 820.350.
(7) Lighting equipment on electric personal assistive  mobility devices shall meet the require-
ments established in ORS 815.284.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 816.340 is amended to read:
816.340. This section establishes exemptions from ORS 816.320 and 816.330. The exemptions es-
tablished under this section are in addition to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. The exemptions
under this section are partial or complete as described in the following:
(1) ORS 816.320 and 816.330 shall not be construed  to prohibit the use of additional parts and
accessories on any vehicle consistent with the provisions of those sections.
(2) Vehicles of special interest  that are registered under ORS 805.020 shall be deemed in com-
pliance with ORS 816.320 and 816.330 if:
(a) The  vehicles are equipped with original manufacturer’s equipment and accessories, or their
equivalent, and if the equipment is maintained in safe operating condition; or
(b) The vehicles are street rods that conform to ORS 815.107.
(3) ORS 816.320 and 816.330 do not apply to any of the following vehicles:
(a) Road machinery.
(b) Road rollers.
(c) Farm tractors, implements of husbandry and farm trailers.
(d) Antique vehicles that are maintained as a collector’s item and  used for exhibitions, parades,
club activities and similar uses, but not used primarily  for the transportation of persons or property.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 8
(4) Motorcycles manufactured before 1973  are not required to be equipped with turn signals if
the motorcycle is not driven during limited visibility conditions under ORS 811.405 and 811.515.
(5) Truck tractors are not required to be equipped with rear reflectors.
(6) Pole trailers are not required to be equipped with side reflectors, side marker  lights, clear-
ance lights or identification lights.
(7) Motor vehicles registered in this state on or before  January 1, 1940, are not required to be
equipped with a high-beam indicator.
(8) Bicycles shall be equipped with lighting equipment as required under ORS 815.280.
(9) Requirements for warning lights on  ambulances and organ transport vehicles  are provided
under ORS 820.350 and 820.360.
(10) Electric personal  assistive mobility devices shall be equipped with lighting equipment as
required under ORS 815.284.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 816.370 is amended to read:
816.370. This section establishes exemptions from ORS 816.350 and 816.360. The exemptions es-
tablished under this section are in addition to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. The exemptions
under this section are partial or complete as described in the following:
(1) ORS 816.350 and 816.360 shall not be construed  to prohibit the use of additional parts and
accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of those sections.
(2) Lighting equipment used on vehicles of special interest that  are registered under ORS
805.020 shall be deemed in  compliance with ORS 816.350 and 816.360 if the equipment is original
manufacturer’s equipment and accessories, or their equivalent  and if the equipment is maintained
in safe operating condition.
(3) ORS 816.350 and 816.360 do not apply to equipment on any of the following:
(a) Road machinery.
(b) Road rollers.
(c) Farm tractors.
(d) Antique vehicles that are maintained as a collector’s item and  used for exhibitions, parades,
club activities and similar uses, but not used primarily  for the transportation of persons or property.
(4) Ambulances , organ transport vehicles  and emergency vehicles are subject to the provisions
under ORS 820.350 and 820.360.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 820.300 is amended to read:
820.300. (1) Subject to conditions, limitations, prohibitions and penalties established  for emer-
gency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  and ambulance drivers under ORS 820.320,  the driver of
an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance may do any of the following:
(a) Park or stand in disregard of a  statute, regulation or ordinance prohibiting that parking or
standing.
(b) Proceed past a red signal or stop sign.
(c) Exceed the designated speed limits.
(d) Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.
(e) Proceed past the flashing bus safety lights without violating ORS 811.155 if the driver first
stops the vehicle and then proceeds only when the driver:
(A) Determines that no passengers of the bus remain on the roadway; and
(B) Proceeds with caution.
(2) The provisions of this section:
(a) Do not relieve the driver of an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or  ambulance
from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all other persons.
(b) Are not a defense to the driver of an emergency  vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or am-
bulance in an action brought for criminal negligence or reckless conduct.
(c) Except as specifically provided in this section, do not relieve the driver of an emergency
vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance from the duty to comply with ORS 811.155.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 820.320 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 9
820.320. (1) A person commits the offense of illegal operation of an emergency vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance if the person is the driver of an  emergency vehicle , organ trans-
port vehicle or ambulance and the person violates any of the following:
(a) The  driver of an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance may only exer-
cise privileges granted under ORS 820.300 when responding to an emergency  call or when respond-
ing to, but not upon returning from, an  emergency. The driver of an emergency vehicle may exercise
privileges granted under ORS 820.300 when in pursuit of  an actual or suspected violator of the law.
(b) The driver of  an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance must use a
visual signal with appropriate  warning lights when the driver is exercising privileges granted under
ORS 820.300.
(c) In addition to any required visual signal, the  driver of an emergency vehicle , organ trans-
port vehicle or ambulance must make use of an audible signal meeting  the requirements under ORS
820.370 when the driver is proceeding past a stop light  or stop sign under privileges granted by ORS
820.300 (1)(b).
(d) A driver of an emergency vehicle , organ  transport vehicle  or ambulance who is exercising
privileges granted under ORS 820.300 by parking or standing an emergency vehicle  in disregard of
a regulation or ordinance prohibiting that parking, stopping or  standing, shall not use the audible
signal.
(e) In exercising  the privileges under ORS 820.300 (1)(e) relating to buses and bus safety lights,
the driver of an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance must first stop the ve-
hicle and then must:
(A) Determine that no passengers of the bus remain on the roadway; and
(B) Proceed with caution.
(f) In proceeding past any stop light or stop sign under the privileges granted  by ORS 820.300,
the driver  of an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance must slow down as may
be necessary for safe operation.
(g) The driver of an emergency vehicle , organ transport vehicle or ambulance must not exceed
any designated speed limit to an extent which endangers persons or property.
(2) The driver of an emergency vehicle that is operated as  an emergency police vehicle is not
required to use either visual signal or the audible signal as described  in this section in order to
exercise the privileges granted in ORS 820.300 when it reasonably  appears to the driver that the
use of either or both would prevent or hamper the apprehension or detection  of a violator of a
statute, ordinance or regulation.
(3) The offense described in this section, illegal operation of an emergency  vehicle , organ
transport vehicle or ambulance, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 820.350 is amended to read:
820.350. (1) Subject to any other law or rule pursuant thereto relating to lighting of a  vehicle,
the Department of Transportation may  prescribe required warning lights for ambulances and organ
transport vehicles . The requirements established under this section may include, but are  not lim-
ited to, numbers required, placement, visibility, rate of flash if applicable and inside indicators.
(2) Enforcement of the requirements established under this section is provided under  ORS
820.360.
SECTION 20.  ORS 820.360 is amended to read:
820.360. (1) A person  commits the offense of illegal ambulance  or organ transport vehicle
lighting equipment  if the person drives or moves on any highway or owns and causes or knowingly
permits to be driven or moved on any highway an ambulance or organ transport vehicle  that  does
not contain and is not at all  times equipped with warning lights in proper condition and adjustment
as required under ORS 820.350.
(2) This  section does not apply to any person or ambulance exempted by ORS 682.035 or 682.079
from regulation by the Oregon Health Authority.
(3) Authority of political subdivisions to regulate  warning lights on ambulances and organ
transport vehicles is limited under ORS 682.031.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 10
(4) The  offense described under this section, illegal ambulance and organ transport vehicle
lighting equipment, is a Class C traffic violation.
SECTION 21.  ORS 820.370 is amended to read:
820.370. (1) Subject to any other law or rule pursuant thereto  relating to the noise of a vehicle,
the Department of Transportation may prescribe required sirens or  other audible signals for ambu-
lances , organ transport vehicles  and emergency vehicles.  The requirements established under this
section may include,  but are not limited to, numbers required, placement, audibility and inside in-
dicators.
(2) Enforcement of the requirements established under this section is provided under  ORS
820.380.
SECTION 22.  ORS 820.380 is amended to read:
820.380. (1) A person commits the offense of illegal ambulance , organ  transport vehicle  or
emergency vehicle sirens if  the person drives or moves on any highway or owns and causes or
knowingly permits to be driven or moved on  any highway an ambulance , organ transport vehicle
or emergency vehicle that does not  contain and is not at all times equipped with sirens or other
audible signals in proper conditions and adjustment as required under ORS 820.370.
(2) This section does not apply to  any ambulance or person operating or owning an ambulance
if the ambulance or person is exempted by ORS 682.035 or  682.079 from regulation by the Oregon
Health Authority.
(3) Authority of political subdivisions to regulate sirens and other audible signals is limited un-
der ORS 682.031.
(4) The offense described under this section, illegal ambulance , organ transport vehicle  or
emergency vehicle sirens, is a Class C traffic violation.
SECTION 23.  ORS 825.017 is amended to read:
825.017. Except as provided in this section and ORS 825.026 and 825.030, this  chapter does not
apply to the persons or vehicles described in this section. The exemption under this section  applies
to the following persons and vehicles:
(1) Vehicles being used by, or under contract with, any school board, district or person  respon-
sible for the administration of  elementary or secondary school activities, and engaged exclusively
in transporting students or combinations of students and other persons to or from school,  to or from
authorized school activities  or other activities sponsored by the governing board of a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or for  purposes provided under ORS 332.427. This exemption shall not
be affected by the charging of a fee to cover the costs of the transportation.
(2) Vehicles being used in a taxicab operation if the vehicle:
(a) Is a passenger vehicle with a passenger seating capacity that does not exceed five;
(b) Carries passengers for hire where the destination  and route traveled may be controlled by
a passenger and the fare is calculated on the basis  of any combination of an initial fee, distance
traveled or waiting time; and
(c) Is transporting persons or property, or both, between points in Oregon.
(3) Vehicles being  used for the transportation of property by private carrier by means of a single
vehicle or combination of vehicles with a combined weight that does not exceed 8,000 pounds.
(4) Vehicles being used in operating implements of husbandry.
(5) Vehicles being used as a hearse , organ transport vehicle  or ambulance.
(6) Vehicles being used over any private road or thoroughfare.
(7) Vehicles being used on any road, thoroughfare or  property, other than a state highway,
county road or city street, for  the removal of forest products as defined in ORS 321.005, or the
product of forest products converted to a form other  than logs at or near the harvesting site, or
when used for the construction or maintenance of the road,  thoroughfare or property, pursuant to
a written agreement or permit authorizing the use, construction or maintenance of  the road,
thoroughfare or property, with:
(a) An agency of the United States;
(b) The State Board of Forestry;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 11
(c) The State Forester; or
(d) A licensee of an agency named in this subsection.
(8) Vehicles being used on any county road for the removal of forest products as  defined in ORS
321.005, or the products of forest products converted to a form other than logs  at or near the har-
vesting site, if:
(a) The use is pursuant to a written agreement entered into with the State  Board of Forestry,
the State Forester or an agency of the United States, authorizing the owner of the motor  vehicle
to use the road and  requiring the owner to pay for or to perform the construction or maintenance
of the county road, including any operator of a motor  vehicle retained to transport logs, poles and
piling for the owners who are exempt under this section;
(b) The board, officer or  agency that entered into the agreement or granted the permit, by
contract with the county court or board of county commissioners,  has assumed the responsibility for
the construction or maintenance of the county road; and
(c) Copies of the agreements or permits required by this subsection  are filed with the Director
of Transportation.
(9) Vehicles being used  in transporting persons with disabilities, with or without their supervi-
sors or assistants, to or from rehabilitation  facilities or child care services if the motor vehicle is
a passenger motor vehicle with a seating capacity of not more than 12  passengers. The exemption
provided by this subsection applies only when the motor vehicle is operated  by or under contract
with any person responsible for the  administration of rehabilitation facilities as defined in ORS
344.710 to 344.730 or child care services  provided by a facility licensed under ORS 329A.250 to
329A.450.
(10) Vehicles  owned or operated by the United States or by any governmental jurisdiction within
the United States except as provided in ORS 825.022. This chapter does apply to vehicles when
owned or operated:
(a) As a carrier of property for hire;
(b) By a transportation district organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650;
(c) By a county service district authorized  to provide public transportation under ORS 451.010;
or
(d) By an intergovernmental body formed by two or more public bodies, as defined in ORS
174.109, to provide public transportation.
(11) Vehicles owned or operated by a mass transit district organized under ORS 267.010  to
267.394.
(12) Vehicles owned or  operated by, or under contract with, a person responsible for the con-
struction or reconstruction of a highway under contract with the  Department of Transportation or
with an agency of the United States when operated  within the immediate construction project as
described in the governmental agency contract during the construction period.
(13) Vehicles owned or operated by, or under contract with, a charitable organization when ex-
clusively engaged in performing transportation,  either one way or round trip, necessary to the op-
eration of the charitable organization. As used in this subsection,  “charitable organization” means
an organization that has no capital stock and no provision for making dividends  or profits, but de-
rives its funds principally  from public and private charity and holds them in trust for the promotion
of the welfare of others and not for profit. Any organization claiming  an exemption under this sub-
section shall file an affidavit with the department stating that it is organized and operated in ac-
cordance with the requirements of this subsection.
(14) Passenger vehicles with a  passenger seating capacity that does not exceed five when used
in the transportation of new telephone books.
(15) A vehicle that is used in a limousine service operation  in which the destination and route
traveled may be controlled by the passenger and the fare is  calculated on the basis of any combi-
nation of initial fee, distance traveled and waiting time if the vehicle:
(a) Is a passenger vehicle with a passenger seating capacity that does not exceed eight;
(b) Carries passengers for hire between points in Oregon; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 12
(c) Operates on an irregular route basis.
(16) Fire trucks and rescue vehicles  that are designated as emergency vehicles by the Depart-
ment of Transportation under ORS 801.260, while involved in emergency and related operations.
(17) A person who provides services related to the packing or  loading of household goods if the
person does not:
(a) Provide or operate a motor vehicle for the movement of the household goods; and
(b) Act as an  agent for any person who does provide or operate a motor vehicle for the move-
ment of the household goods.
SECTION 24.
(1) Sections 2 and 6 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 682.025,
682.031, 811.145, 811.150, 811.265, 811.507, 814.050, 815.225, 816.050,  816.310, 816.340, 816.370,
820.300, 820.320, 820.350, 820.360,  820.370, 820.380 and 825.017 by sections 3 and 4 and 7 to 23
of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Transportation may take any
action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the authority and the department to exercise, on and after the  operative date
specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all the duties, functions and powers conferred on
the authority and  the department by sections 2 and 6 of this 2025 Act and the amendments
to ORS 682.025, 682.031, 811.145, 811.150, 811.265, 811.507, 814.050, 815.225,  816.050, 816.310,
816.340, 816.370, 820.300, 820.320, 820.350, 820.360, 820.370, 820.380 and 825.017 by sections 3 and
4 and 7 to 23 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 25. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 28, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1161 (SB 1161-A) Page 13